Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB19.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 3(d) of the act of January 17, 1968 (P.L.11, No.5), known as The Minimum Wage Act of 1968, is amended to read:Section 3. Definitions.--As used in this act:* * *(d) "Wages" mean compensation due to any employe by reason of his or her employment, payable in legal tender of the United States or checks on banks convertible into cash on demand at 1234567891011121314151617181920212223 full face value, subject to such deductions, charges or allowances as may be permitted by regulations of the secretary under section 9."Wage" paid to any employe includes the reasonable cost, as determined by the secretary, to the employer for furnishing such employe with board, lodging, or other facilities, if such board, lodging, or other facilities are customarily furnished by such employer to his or her employes: Provided, That the cost of board, lodging, or other facilities shall not be included as a part of the wage paid to any employe to the extent it is excluded therefrom under the terms of a bona fide collective-bargaining agreement applicable to the particular employe: Provided, further, That the secretary is authorized to determine the fair value of such board, lodging, or other facilities for defined classes of employes and in defined areas, based on average cost to the employer or to groups of employers similarly situated, or average value to groups of employes, or other appropriate measures of fair value. Such evaluations, where applicable and pertinent, shall be used in lieu of actual measure of cost in determining the wage paid to any employe.In determining the hourly wage an employer is required to pay a tipped employe, the amount paid such employe by his or her employer shall be an amount equal to: (i) the cash wage paid the employe which for the purposes of the determination shall be not less than [the cash wage required to be paid the employe on the date immediately prior to the effective date of this subparagraph] seventy percent of the wage in effect under section 4; and (ii) an additional amount on account of the tips received by the employe which is equal to the difference between the wage specified in subparagraph (i) and the wage in effect 20250SB0019PN0685 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 under section 4 of this act. The additional amount on account of tips may not exceed the value of tips actually received by the employe. The previous sentence shall not apply with respect to any tipped employe unless:(1) Such employe has been informed by the employer of the provisions of this subsection;(2) All tips received by such employe have been retained by the employe and shall not be surrendered to the employer to be used as wages to satisfy the requirement to pay the current hourly minimum rate in effect; where the gratuity is added to the charge made by the establishment, either by the management, or by the customer, the gratuity shall become the property of the employe; except that this subsection shall not be construed to prohibit the pooling of tips among employes who customarily and regularly receive tips.* * *Section 2. Section 4(a) of the act is amended by adding a paragraph to read:Section 4. Minimum Wages.--Except as may otherwise be provided under this act:(a) Every employer shall pay to each of his or her employes wages for all hours worked at a rate of not less than:* * *(9) Fifteen dollars ($15) an hour beginning January 1, 2026. Each succeeding January 1 thereafter, the minimum wage shall be increased by an annual cost-of-living adjustment calculated by the secretary using the percentage change in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers (CPI-U) for the Pennsylvania, New Jersey, Delaware and Maryland area. In calculating the adjustment, the secretary shall use the most recent twelve-month 20250SB0019PN0685 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 period for which figures have been officially reported by the United States Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics. At least sixty days prior to the date the adjustment is due to take effect, the percentage increase and the minimum wage amount, rounded to the nearest multiple of five cents (5¢), shall be determined by the secretary. The secretary shall, within ten days following the determination, forward a notice of the determination to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin. If in a year the increase to the minimum wage does not provide a minimum wage greater than or equal to the minimum wage under Federal law, the minimum wage shall be increased to the minimum wage under Federal law.* * *Section 3. Section 5(c)(2) of the act is amended and the subsection is amended by adding a paragraph to read:Section 5. Exemptions.--* * *(c) * * *(2) Such employer shall pay the full amount of the minimum wage under section 4(a)(8) beginning July 1, 2008 through December 31, 2025.(3) Such employer shall pay the full amount of the minimum wage under section 4(a)(9) beginning January 1, 2026.Section 4. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 5.2. Gratuities.--(a) A gratuity shall be the property of the employe who received the voluntary monetary contribution from a guest, patron or customer for services rendered. An employer shall not take a gratuity or a part of a gratuity received by an employe from a guest, customer or patron.20250SB0019PN0685 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b) An employer that accepts payment of a gratuity by credit card shall pay the employe the full amount of the gratuity that the guest, customer or patron indicated on the credit card slip without a deduction for any credit card processing fees or costs that may be charged to the employer by the credit card company. The payment of a gratuity made by a guest, customer or patron using a credit card shall be made to the employe not later than the next regular payday after the date the guest, customer or patron authorized the credit card payment. Section 5. Sections 9, 12 and 13 of the act are amended to read:Section 9. Enforcement; Rules and Regulations.--[The secretary shall enforce this act.] (a) The secretary shall make and, from time to time, revise regulations, with the assistance of the board, when requested by the secretary, which shall be deemed appropriate to carry out the purposes of this act and to safeguard the minimum wage rates thereby established. Such regulations may include, but are not limited to, regulations defining and governing bona fide executive, administrative, or professional employes and outside salespersons, learners and apprentices, their number, proportion, length of learning period, and other working conditions; [handicapped] workers with disabilities; part-time pay; overtime standards; bonuses; allowances for board, lodging, apparel, or other facilities or services customarily furnished by employers to employes; allowances for gratuities; or allowances for such other special conditions or circumstances which may be incidental to a particular employer-employe relationship.(b) The secretary shall have the authority to investigate possible violations of this act and to assess administrative 20250SB0019PN0685 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 penalties under section 12.Section 12. Penalties.--(a) Any employer and his or her agent, or the officer or agent of any corporation, who discharges or in any other manner discriminates against any employe because such employe has testified or is about to testify before the secretary or his or her representative in any investigation or proceeding under or related to this act, or because such employer believes that said employe may so testify shall, upon conviction thereof in a summary proceeding, be sentenced to pay a fine of not less than [five hundred dollars ($500)] one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) nor more than [one thousand dollars ($1,000)] three thousand dollars ($3,000), and in default of the payment of such fine and costs, shall be sentenced to imprisonment for not less than ten days nor more than ninety days.(b) Any employer or the officer or agent of any corporation who pays or agrees to pay any employe less than the rates applicable to such employe under this act shall, upon conviction thereof in a summary proceeding, be sentenced to pay a fine of not less than [seventy-five dollars ($75)] two hundred twenty-five dollars ($225) nor more than [three hundred dollars ($300)] nine hundred dollars ($900) or to undergo imprisonment of not less than ten nor more than sixty days, or both. Each week in which such employe is paid less than the rate applicable to him or her under this act and for each employe who is paid less than the prescribed rate, a separate offense shall be deemed to occur. Any agreement between the employer and the employe to work for less than the applicable wage rate shall be no defense to action by the Commonwealth under this section.(c) Any employer or the officer or agent of any corporation 20250SB0019PN0685 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 who violates any other provision of this act or of any regulation issued thereunder shall, upon conviction thereof in a summary proceeding, be sentenced to pay a fine of not less than [one hundred dollars ($100)] three hundred dollars ($300) nor more than [five hundred dollars ($500)] one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500), and each day of such failure to comply with this act or regulation, shall constitute a separate offense.Section 13. Civil Actions.--(a) If any employe is paid by his or her employer less than the minimum wages provided by section 4 of this act or by any regulation issued thereunder, such worker may recover in a civil action the full amount of such minimum wage less any amount actually paid to the worker by the employer, together with costs and such reasonable attorney's fees as may be allowed by the court, and any agreement between the employer and the worker to work for less than such minimum wage shall be no defense to such action. [At the request of any employe paid less than the minimum wage to which such employe was entitled under this act and regulations issued thereunder, the secretary may take an assignment of such wage claim, in trust for the assigning worker and may bring any legal action necessary to collect such claim,](b) The secretary may bring any legal action necessary to collect the wages of any employe who is paid by his or her employer less than the minimum wages provided by section 4 or by any regulation issued thereunder and the employer shall be required to pay the cost and such reasonable attorney's fees as may be allowed by the court.(c) In an action brought under this section, whether brought by the employe or by the secretary, where there is a finding of 20250SB0019PN0685 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 a violation by the employer under this act, the employer shall be liable for any fees and costs associated with enforcement of this act and liquidated damages in an amount equal to the wages or overtime compensation owed to the employe unless the employer shows that the act or omission resulting in the nonpayment of wages was in good faith and the employer had reasonable grounds for believing that the act or omission was not in violation of this act.Section 6. Section 14.1 of the act is repealed:[Section 14.1. Preemption.--(a) Except as set forth in subsection (b), this act shall preempt and supersede any local ordinance or rule concerning the subject matter of this act.(b) This section does not prohibit local regulation pursuant to an ordinance which was adopted by a municipality prior to January 1, 2006, and which remained in effect on January 1, 2006.]Section 7. The act is amended by adding sections to read:Section 14.2. Local Option.--(a) A municipality may not adopt a local ordinance or regulation providing for a minimum wage greater than the wage provided under section 4 unless:(1) the municipality submits a declaration of its intent to set a greater minimum wage policy to the secretary; and(2) a period of ninety days has lapsed since the submission of intent to the secretary.(b) If a municipality fulfills the conditions of subsection (a), a municipality that adopts an ordinance or regulation providing for a greater minimum wage than the wage provided under section 4 may also adopt provisions for the local enforcement of the ordinance or regulation, including, but not limited to, enforcement by private parties.20250SB0019PN0685 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (c) A municipality may withdraw its declaration of intent to set a greater minimum wage policy by adopting an ordinance to withdraw and submitting notice to the secretary. The notice of intent to withdraw shall include a copy of the ordinance the municipality will adopt to effectuate the withdrawal. The following shall apply:(1) All prior ordinances or regulations or parts of ordinances or regulations or any prior acts taken by the municipality to set a greater minimum wage than provided under section 4 shall be repealed by the adoption of the ordinance to withdraw.(2) After withdrawal, nothing shall prohibit a municipality from subsequently submitting a declaration of intent to set a greater minimum wage policy under subsection (a).(3) After withdrawal, the municipality shall comply with all provisions under this act.(d) Nothing in this act shall be construed to:(1) Authorize a municipality to adopt a wage lower than the minimum wage as required by section 4 and 29 U.S.C. Ch. 8 (relating to fair labor standards).(2) Prohibit the secretary from enforcing this act.(e) Definition.--As used in this section, the term "municipality" means a county, city, borough, incorporated town, township, home rule municipality, optional plan municipality or optional charter municipality.Section 14.3. Taxpayer Savings and Reinvestment.-- (a) One year after the effective date of section 4(a)(9) and after each subsequent yearly increase to the minimum wage thereafter, the Secretary of Human Services shall determine the amount of money that will be saved from the increase of wages to individuals 20250SB0019PN0685 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 thereby making the individuals ineligible for programs under the Department of Human Services. The Secretary of Human Services shall:(1) Publish the amount of savings on the publicly accessible Internet website of the Department of Human Services. (2) Transmit a notice of the information under this section to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin. (b) Money saved by the Commonwealth under this section shall be used to provide increases to child-care providers, direct- care workers and for home-based and community-based services. The Secretary of Human Services shall distribute money saved under this section in the same manner that the providers are paid. The programs that will receive the savings and the amounts being augmented to each appropriation shall be forwarded to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.Section 8. This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0019PN0685 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718